Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-421
Accidents; reports; contents.

Every person operating a plant where machinery is used, shall report in writing to the Department of Labor all fatal accidents within forty-eight hours after their occurrence, and all other accidents within two weeks after their occurrence. Such report shall state fully the cause of the accidents, the nature and extent of the injuries, and the probable loss of time which will result therefrom.

Laws 1911, c. 67, § 10, p. 302;

Laws 1913, c. 103, § 1, p. 261;

R.S.1913, § 3598;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 17, p. 562;

C.S.1922, § 7698;

C.S.1929, § 48-417;

R.S.1943, § 48-421.

Applicability of act is limited to operator. Quist v. Duda, 159 Neb. 393, 67 N.W.2d 481 (1954).